Alaska statutes. Title 22. Judiciary.
Chapter 25. Retirement and Death Benefits.
Sec. 22.25.100.
Exemption of retirement funds and benefits.

Employee contributions and other amounts held in the judicial retirement system and benefits payable under this chapter are exempt from garnishment, execution, and levy as provided in AS 09.38 (Alaska Exemptions Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 65 SLA 1991)

Sec. 22.25.110.
Special rules for treatment of qualified military service.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of this chapter, with respect to qualified military service, contributions shall be made and benefits and service credit shall be provided in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 414(u).

To the extent required by 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(37), if a member dies while performing qualified military service, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 43, the survivors of the member are entitled to any additional benefits that would have been provided to the survivors under the plan had the member resumed employment and then terminated employment on account of death. For purposes of this subsection, periods of qualified military service are not included in calculations of credited service.

Consistent with and to the extent required by 26 U.S.C. 414(u)(12), a member receiving differential wage payments from an employer shall be treated as employed by that employer, and the differential wage payment shall be treated as compensation for purposes of applying the limits on annual additions under 26 U.S.C. 415(b). For purposes of this subsection, “differential wage payment” means any payment that

is made by an employer to an individual with respect to any period during which the individual is performing service in the uniformed services, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 43, while on active duty for a period of more than 30 days; and

represents all or a portion of the wages the individual would have received from the employer if the individual were performing service for the employer.

History.

(§ 24 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 102 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 102, SLA 2014, adding subsections (b) and (c) to this section, see 2014 Senate Journal 1469 — 1470.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 29, 2014, added (b), retroactive to January 1, 2007; added (c), retroactive to January 1, 2009.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 11, ch. 102, SLA 2014, subsection (b) is retroactive to January 1, 2007, and subsection (c) is retroactive to January 1, 2009.

Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, as introduced by the governor and passed by the legislature, refer to 38 U.S.C. 43 but this statute does not exist. It is possible that this reference was intended to refer to 38 U.S.C. 4301 — 4335.

Sec. 22.25.800.
Pension forfeiture.

The provisions of AS

37.10.310

apply to pension benefits under this chapter.

History.

(§ 10 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Sec. 22.25.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“actuarial equivalent” means the adjustment necessary to obtain equality in value of the aggregate expected payments under two different forms of pension payments, considering expected mortality and interest earnings on the basis of assumptions, factors, and methods specified in regulations issued under the system that are formally adopted by the Alaska Retirement Management Board that clearly preclude employer discretion in the determination of the amount of any justice’s, judge’s, or member’s benefit;

“judge” means a judge of the court of appeals, a superior court judge, or a district court judge;

“justice” means a supreme court justice;

“member” means an administrative director of the Alaska Court System who is eligible to participate in the system, a justice, or a judge;

“qualified domestic relations order” means a divorce or dissolution judgment under AS 25.24, including an order approving a property settlement, that

creates or recognizes the existence of an alternate payee’s right to, or assigns to an alternate payee the right to, receive all or a portion of the member contributions and interest or benefits payable with respect to a justice or judge;

sets out the name and last known mailing address, if any, of the justice or judge and of each alternate payee covered by the order;

sets out the amount or percentage of the justice’s or judge’s benefit, or of any survivor’s benefit, to be paid to the alternate payee, or sets out the manner in which that amount or percentage is to be determined;

sets out the number of payments or period to which the order applies;

sets out the plan to which the order applies;

does not require any type or form of benefit or any option not otherwise provided by this chapter;

does not require an increase of benefits in excess of the amount provided by this chapter, determined on the basis of actuarial value;

does not require the payment, to an alternate payee, of benefits that are required to be paid to another alternate payee under another order previously determined to be a qualified domestic relations order.

History.

(§ 26 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 25 ch 68 SLA 2000; am § 25 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 19 ch 92 SLA 2004; am § 51 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For judicial retirement system, see 2 AAC 37, art. 1.